Utah statutes.
72-2-114.   Transfer of monies -- Debt service.
(1)  When there are insufficient appropriations or monies available from other
legal sources to pay interest on any bond anticipation notes issued under the
authority of Title 63B, Chapter 6, Part 3, 1997 Highway Bond Anticipation Note
Authorization, the Division of Finance shall inform the department of the
amount necessary to pay that interest.
(2)  After receiving notice under Subsection (1), the department shall
transfer monies from any available source other than the Transportation Fund
to the Division of Finance for deposit into the Debt Service Fund to pay
interest on bond anticipation notes issued under the authority of Title 63B,
Chapter 6, Part 3, 1997 Highway Bond Anticipation Note Authorization.
